src/phonology/mns-phon.twolc
!TOS
!TOS "Remove fleeting vowel Ы at end of syncopating stem: when after morpheme boundary, and followed by a VOWEL"
!TOS  ы:0   <=>   _  Cns (ь:) %^Syncope: ;
!TOS
!TOS ! _ Cns %^Syncope: %> [ %{ЫИØ%}: | %{ЫØ%}: ] [ т | н ]  ;
!TOS !ы2:0   <=>   _  Cns (ь:) %> ( %{ТØ%}: ) :Vow  ;
!TOS !   _  PostSyncStem (ь:) :Vow ;
!TOS !!€ потыр%^Syncope%>%{УЮØ%}м
!TOS !!€ пот0р0%>ум
!TOS !!€ потыр%^Syncope%>%{ТØ%}%{ЭЕ%}
!TOS !!€ пот0р0%>0е
!TOS !!€ потыр%^Syncope%>%{ЫИØ%}т
!TOS !!€ пот0р0%>ыт
!TOS !!€ потыр%^Syncope%>0ме̄н
!TOS !!€ пот0р0%>уме̄н
!TOS     VowNoI %> %{ТØ%}: _ л ;
!TOS !!€ э̄ква%>%{ТØ%}ыл
!TOS !!€ э̄ква%>00л
!TOS     _ %^RmVow: ;
!TOS
!TOS !!€grís%>s
!TOS !!€grís00
!TOS
!TOS !!$grís%>s
!TOS !!$grís>s
!TOS
!TOS ! "Palatalization of suffix vowels"
!TOS ! Vx:Vy <=> ь: _ ;
!TOS ! 	where Vx in ( ы )
!TOS ! 	      Vy in ( и )
!TOS ! 	      matched ;
!TOS
!TOS ! "Delete Palatalisation Mark"
!TOS ! ь:0 <=> _ Vow: ;
!TOS
!TOS !! !!VOWEL DELETION
!TOS "%{ЫИØ%}:0"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ЫИØ%}:0 <=>  VowNoI:    %> _ ( %^PxDu2: | %^PxPl2: ) [ г | н | т ] ;
!TOS                [ и: | ы: ] %> _ ( %^PxDu2: | %^PxPl2: ) [     н | т ] ;
!TOS !! JACK
!TOS !?  VowNoI:  %> _ ( %^PxDu2: | %^PxPl2: ) %> [ г | н | т ] ;
!TOS !!€ рума%>%{ЫИØ%}н%>%{ЫØ%}т
!TOS !!€ рума%>0н%>0т
!TOS
!TOS "%{ЫØ%}:0"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ЫØ%}:0 <=> :Vow ((%>) :0+ ) (Cns (ь)) %> _ т  ;
!TOS !! JACK
!TOS !!€ рума%>%{ЫИØ%}н%>%{ЫØ%}т
!TOS !!€ рума%>0н%>0т
!TOS      :Vow (Cns) %> _ н ;
!TOS !     :Vow (Cns) %> _ н ;
!TOS !!€ па̄рт%>%{ЫИØ%}г%>%{ЫØ%}н
!TOS !!€ па̄рт%>ыг%>0н
!TOS !!€ ха̄п%>%{ЫØ%}н
!TOS !!€ ха̄п%>0н
!TOS
!TOS "%{УЮØ%}:0"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{УЮØ%}:0 <=> Vow %> _ м ;
!TOS                VowNoI %> _ в ;
!TOS
!TOS "%{АЯØ%}:0"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{АЯØ%}:0 <=> VowNoI %> _  ;
!TOS
!TOS
!TOS "и:0"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  и:0 <=> # Cns* Vow Cns _ Cns %> [ %{ЫИØ%}: | %{ЫØ%}: ] т  ;
!TOS
!TOS "ь:0"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  ь:0 <=> _ (%^Syncope:) %> [ %{ЫИØ%}: | %{УЮØ%}: | %{АЯØ%}: | %{ТØ%}: [ %{ЭЕ%}: | %{ЭЕLong%}: ] ]  ;
!TOS !!€ ха̄ль%>%{ТØ%}%{ЭЕ%}
!TOS !!€ ха̄л0%>0е
!TOS
!TOS "%{ТØ%}:0"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ТØ%}:0 <=> Cns (ь: ) (%^Syncope:) %> _ [ %{ЭЕ%}: | %{ЭЕLong%}: | ы л ]  ;
!TOS ! # Cns* (Vow Cns) Vow Cns (ь: ) %> _ [ %{ЭЕ%}: | %{ЭЕLong%}: ]  ;
!TOS !!€ ха̄ль%>%{ТØ%}%{ЭЕ%}
!TOS !!€ ха̄л0%>0е
!TOS !!€ кол%>%{ТØ%}ыл
!TOS !!€ кол%>0ыл
!TOS !!€ потыр%^Syncope%>%{ТØ%}%{ЭЕ%}
!TOS !!€ пот0р%>0е
!TOS       VowNoI %>  _ ы: л ;
!TOS !!€ э̄ква%>%{ТØ%}ыл
!TOS !!€ э̄ква%>00л
!TOS
!TOS
!TOS !! VOWEL FROM ARCHIVOWEL
!TOS "%{ЫИØ%}:ы"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ЫИØ%}:ы <=> [ и | ы ] %> 0: _   г  ;
!TOS                [CnsNonAlv|CnsAlv]       %>    _ [ г | н | т ] ;
!TOS !(2007: 30) short elsewhere long??               Cns %> _ %^PxDu2: н  ;
!TOS !               Cns %> _ (%^PxDu2: ) [ г | н | т ] ;
!TOS !!€ кол%>%{ЫИØ%}н%>%{ЫØ%}т
!TOS !!€ кол%>ын%>0т
!TOS
!TOS "%{ЫИØ%}:и"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ЫИØ%}:и <=> [ ь: | CnsSoft ] %> _ [ г | н | т ] ;
!TOS                 [ и | ы ] %> 0: _ %^PxDu2: н  ;
!TOS "%{ЫØ%}:ы"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ЫØ%}:ы <=> Cns (ы:0|и:0) [ CnsAlv | CnsNonAlv ] %> _ т  ;
!TOS !€#
!TOS          Vow Cns+ (ы:0) Cns (%^Syncope:) %> _ н ;
!TOS !!€ па̄рт%>%{ЫØ%}н
!TOS !!€ па̄рт%>ын
!TOS !!€ потыр%^Syncope%>%{ЫØ%}н
!TOS !!€ пот0р0%>ын
!TOS
!TOS "%{ЭЕ%}:э"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ЭЕ%}:э <=> [ CnsAlv - р | Vow ] %> %{ТØ%}: _ ;
!TOS
!TOS "%{ЭЕ%}:е"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ЭЕ%}:е <=> [ CnsSoft | р | CnsNonAlv | ь: ] (%^Syncope:) %> %{ТØ%}: _  ;
!TOS !!€ ха̄ль%>%{ТØ%}%{ЭЕ%}
!TOS !!€ ха̄л0%>0е
!TOS !!€ потыр%^Syncope%>%{ТØ%}%{ЭЕ%}
!TOS !!€ пот0р0%>0е
!TOS
!TOS "%{УЮØ%}:у"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{УЮØ%}:у <=> Cns %> _ [ м | в ] ;
!TOS
!TOS "%{УЮØ%}:ю"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{УЮØ%}:ю <=> ь: %> _ м ;
!TOS                [ и | ы | ь: ] %> _ в ;
!TOS
!TOS "%{АЯØ%}:а"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{АЯØ%}:а <=> Cns %> _  ;
!TOS
!TOS "%{АЯØ%}:я"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{АЯØ%}:я <=> [ и | ы | ь: ] %> _  ;
!TOS
!TOS
!TOS
!TOS ! !!VOWEL LENGTHENING
!TOS "%{ЫИØ%}:ы̄"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ЫИØ%}:ы̄ <=>   [ CnsAlv | CnsNonAlv ]  %>  _ [ %^PxPl2: | %^PxDu2: ] ;
!TOS !(2007: 30 ) short  [ CnsAlv | CnsNonAlv ]  %>  _  %^PxPl2: ;
!TOS
!TOS
!TOS "%{ЫИØ%}:ӣ"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ЫИØ%}:ӣ <=> [ ь: | CnsSoft  ] %> _ [ %^PxPl2: | %^PxDu2: ] ;
!TOS !          [ ь: | CnsSoft | CnsNonAlv ] %> _ [ %^PxDu2: ] ;
!TOS
!TOS
!TOS !"%{ЭЕ%}:э̄"
!TOS !!! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS ! %{ЭЕ%}:э̄ <=> [ CnsAlv | Vow ] %> %{ТØ%}: _ %^PxDu3: ;
!TOS
!TOS !"%{ЭЕ%}:е̄"
!TOS !!! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS ! %{ЭЕ%}:е̄ <=>  [ CnsSoft | CnsNonAlv | ь:]  %> %{ТØ%}: _ %^PxDu3: ;
!TOS !!!€ ха̄ль%>%{ТØ%}%{ЭЕ%}%^PxDu3н
!TOS !!!€ ха̄л0%>0е̄0н
!TOS
!TOS "%{ЭЕLong%}:э̄"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ЭЕLong%}:э̄ <=> [ CnsAlv | Vow ] %> %{ТØ%}: _ ;
!TOS !!€ аки%>%{ТØ%}%{ЭЕLong%}н
!TOS !!€ аки%>тэ̄н
!TOS
!TOS "%{ЭЕLong%}:е̄"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ЭЕLong%}:е̄ <=> [ CnsSoft | CnsNonAlv | ь: ] %> %{ТØ%}: _ ;
!TOS !!€ ха̄ль%>%{ТØ%}%{ЭLongЕ%н
!TOS !!€ ха̄л0%>0е̄н
!TOS
!TOS "а:а̄"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  а:а̄ <=> _ %> %{ЫИØ%}: %^PxPl2: ;
!TOS !! JACK
!TOS !!€ рума%>%{ЫИØ%}%^PxPl2н
!TOS !!€ рума̄%>00н
!TOS
!TOS "и:ӣ"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  и:ӣ <=> _ %> %{ЫИØ%}: %^PxDu2: ;
!TOS
!TOS "ы:ы̄"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  ы:ы̄ <=> _ %> %{ЫИØ%}: %^PxDu2: ;
!TOS
!TOS
!TOS !! !!CONSONANTS
!TOS "%{ТØ%}:т"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{ТØ%}:т <=> Vow %> _ [ %{ЭЕ%}: | %{ЭЕLong%}: ]  ;
!TOS
!TOS !! !!CONSONANT LOSS
!TOS "т:0"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  т:0 <=> т %> _ ы л ;
!TOS
!TOS !! !!SANDHI
!TOS
!TOS "0:й"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  0:й <=> [ и | ы ] %> _  %{ЫИØ%}: [ г | %^PxDu2: н ] ;
!TOS
!TOS "%{УØ%}:у"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME@__
!TOS  %{УØ%}:у <=> ы: Cns %^Syncope: %> _  м е̄ н ;
!TOS !!€ потыр%>%{УØ%}ме̄н
!TOS !!€ пот0р%>уме̄н
!TOS
!TOS
!TOS ! 2017-03-17 It is not necessary to remove triggers a second time
!TOS ! They have already been removed by default in their declarations JACK
!TOS !"Required %^PxDu2 loss"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME__
!TOS ! %^PxDu2:0 => _ ;
!TOS
!TOS !"Required %^PxDu3 loss"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME__
!TOS ! %^PxDu3:0 => _ ;
!TOS
!TOS !"Required %^PxPl2 loss"
!TOS !! __@RULENAME__
!TOS ! %^PxPl2:0 => _ ;
!TOS

!!€ a
!!€ b
